North Carolina, session 2025, SB1063.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 120-36.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 120-36.7. Long-term fiscal notes.
(a) Budget Outlook; Proposed Legislation. – Every fiscal analysis of the State budget
outlook shall encompass the upcoming five-year period. Every fiscal analysis of the impact of
proposed legislation on the State budget shall estimate the impact for the first five fiscal years
the legislation would be in effect.
(b) Proposed State Buildings. – Upon the request of a member of the General Assembly,
the Fiscal Research Division shall prepare a fiscal analysis of proposed legislation to appropriate
funds for a State building. The analysis shall estimate the projected maintenance and operating
costs of the building for the first 20 fiscal years after it is completed.
(c) Proposed New Programs. – Upon the request of a member of the General Assembly,
the Fiscal Research Division shall prepare a fiscal analysis of proposed legislation to create a
new State program. The analysis shall identify and estimate all personnel costs of the proposed
new program for the first five fiscal years it will operate. The analysis shall also include a
five-year estimate of space requirements, an indication of whether those requirements can be
satisfied using existing State-owned facilities, and estimated costs of occupying leased space
where State-owned space is not available.
(d) Proposed Increases in Incarceration. –Fiscal Analysis. – Every bill and resolution
introduced in the General Assembly proposing any change in the law that could cause a net
increase in the length of time for which persons are incarcerated or the number of persons
incarcerated, whether by increasing penalties for violating existing laws, by criminalizing
behavior, or by any other means, that does not require a fiscal note pursuant to Article 6D of this
Chapter, shall not be scheduled for consideration in committee until a fiscal note is prepared as
provided in this section and shall have attached to it at the time of its consideration by the General
Assembly a fiscal note prepared by the Fiscal Research Division. The fiscal note shall identify
and estimate, for the first five fiscal years the proposed change would be in effect, all costs of the
proposed legislation. The following, additional requirements apply for certain notes:
(1) Proposed State Buildings. – If the proposed legislation appropriates funds for
a State building, the analysis shall estimate the projected maintenance and
operating costs of the building for the first 20 fiscal years after it is completed.
(2) Proposed New Programs. – If the proposed legislation creates a new State
program, the analysis shall identify and estimate all personnel costs of the
proposed new program for the first five fiscal years it will operate. The
*S1063-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
analysis shall also include a five-year estimate of space requirements, an
indication of whether those requirements can be satisfied using existing
State-owned facilities, and estimated costs of occupying leased space where
State-owned space is not available.
(3) Proposed Increases to Incarceration. – If the proposed legislation changes the
law so as to potentially cause a net increase in the length of time for which
persons are incarcerated or the number of persons incarcerated, whether by
increasing penalties for violating existing laws, by criminalizing behavior, or
by any other means, the note shall be prepared in consultation with the
Sentencing Policy and Advisory Commission and shall identify and estimate,
for the first five fiscal years the proposed change would be in effect, all costs
of the proposed net increase in incarceration, including capital outlay costs if
the legislation would require increased cell space.
If, after careful investigation, the Fiscal Research Division determines that no dollar estimate
required pursuant to this section is possible, the note shall contain a statement to that effect,
setting forth the reasons why no dollar estimate can be given. No comment or opinion shall be
included in the fiscal note with regard to the merits of the measure for which the note is prepared.
However, technical and mechanical defects may be noted.
The sponsor of each bill or resolution to which this subsection applies shall present a copy of
the bill or resolution with the request for a fiscal note to the Fiscal Research Division. Upon
receipt of the request and the copy of the bill or resolution, the Fiscal Research Division shall
prepare the fiscal note as promptly as possible. The Fiscal Research Division shall prepare the
fiscal note and transmit it to the sponsor within two weeks after the request is made, unless the
sponsor agrees to an extension of time.
This fiscal note shall be attached to the original of each proposed bill or resolution that is
reported favorably by any committee of the General Assembly, but shall be separate from the bill
or resolution and shall be clearly designated as a fiscal note. A fiscal note attached to a bill or
resolution pursuant to this subsection is not a part of the bill or resolution and is not an expression
of legislative intent proposed by the bill or resolution.
If a committee of the General Assembly reports favorably a proposed bill or resolution with
an amendment that proposes a change in the law that could cause a net increase in the length of
time for which persons are incarcerated or the number of persons incarcerated, whether by
increasing penalties for violating existing laws, by criminalizing behavior, or by any other means,
the chair of the committee shall obtain from the Fiscal Research Division and attach to the
amended bill or resolution a fiscal note as provided in this section."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the General Assembly
the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year
to accomplish the requirements of this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1063-First Edition